District of Columbia statutes.
25-504

Minimum annual fees for on-premises retail licenses, class C and D.

The minimum annual fees for an on-premises retailer’s licenses, class C and D, shall be as set forth on the following schedule. Capacity shall be the posted level of occupancy approved under the Construction Codes, as defined under § 6-1401 and as set forth in Title 12 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.

Type
Capacity
Class C (beer, wine, spirits)
Class D (beer & wine)

Restaurant
99 or fewer.
$500
$300

100 to 199.
$1,000
$600

200 to 499.
$1,500
$900

500 or more.
$2,000
$1,200

Tavern
99 or fewer.
$800
$500

100 to 199.
$1,600
$1,000

200 or more.
$2,400
$1,500

Nightclub
99 or fewer.
$1,500
$1,000

100 to 199.
$2,000
$1,250

200 to 499.
$2,500
$1,500

500 to 999.
$3,500
$2,000

1,000 or more.
$4,500
$3,500

Hotel
99 or fewer guest rooms
$2,000
$1,000

100 or more guest rooms
$4,000
$2,000

Club

$1,500
$500

Multipurpose facility
$1,500
$500

Marine vessel
Single vessel.
$1,500
$750

Marine vessel line
3 or fewer vessels and dockside waiting areas
$2,500
$1,000

Each additional vessel or dockside waiting area.
$1,500
$500

Railroad dining or club car Single car.
$500
$250

Railroad company
All dining or club cars
$1,500
$750

Caterer
More than $1,000,000 per year gross annual receipts
$5,000
-

Caterer
$1,000,000 or less per year gross annual receipts
$4,000
-

Caterer
$500,000 or less per year gross annual receipts
$3,000
-

Caterer
$300,000 or less per year gross annual receipts
$2,000
-

Caterer
$200,000 or less per year gross annual receipts
$1,000
-

Caterer
$100,000 or less per year gross annual receipts
$750
-

Caterer
$50,000 or less per year gross annual receipts
$500
-

Caterer
$25,000 or less per year gross annual receipts
$300
-

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 324, ch. 4, § 11
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 1
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 997, ch. 588
July 2, 1935, 49 Stat. 444, ch. 359
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 898, 899, ch. 756, §§ 3-7
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, §§ 1, 2
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title V, § 501
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(d)
May 31, 1962, 76 Stat. 89, Pub. L. 87-470, § 1
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 2
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-102, § 2(a), (b), 23 DCR 8732
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5117
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 6, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-204, § 2, 30 DCR 185
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-16, § 3, 30 DCR 3193
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(a), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 5, 34 DCR 907
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(b), 38 DCR 4974
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1658
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202, § 2(b), 45 DCR 8412
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(1), 46 DCR 3142
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(v), 51 DCR 6525
1981 Ed., § 25-504.
1973 Ed., § 25-111.
D.C. Law 15-187 added a new row after the row designated “Nightclub”; deleted the five rows designated as “Caterer” which pertained to capacity in terms of annual revenue and also set forth the license fees; and added eight new rows designated as “Caterer”.